apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="kilk/adziesiąt__num">
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adziesiąt</l> <r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adziesiąt</l> <r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>udziesięcioma</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>udziesięcioma</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udziesięciu</l><r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adziesiąt</l> <r>adziesiąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pięćdziesi/ąt__num">
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąt</l>        <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąt</l>        <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ęcioma</l>    <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ęcioma</l>    <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąt</l>        <r>ąt<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dw/ieście__num">
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieście</l>    <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieście</l>    <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ustoma</l>    <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ustoma</l>    <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ustu</l>      <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieście</l>    <r>ieście<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pię/ćset__num">
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ćset</l>      <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ćset</l>      <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciuset</l>    <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ćset</l>      <r>ćset<s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dwieście">        <i>dw</i><par n="dw/ieście__num"/></e>
<e lm="dziewięćset">     <i>dziewię</i><par n="pię/ćset__num"/></e>
<e lm="dziewięćdziesiąt"><i>dziewięćdziesi</i><par n="pięćdziesi/ąt__num"/></e>
<e lm="kilkadziesiąt">   <i>kilk</i><par n="kilk/adziesiąt__num"/></e>
<e lm="osiemdziesiąt">   <i>osiemdziesi</i><par n="pięćdziesi/ąt__num"/></e>
<e lm="pięćset">         <i>pię</i><par n="pię/ćset__num"/></e>
<e lm="pięćdziesiąt">    <i>pięćdziesi</i><par n="pięćdziesi/ąt__num"/></e>
<e lm="siedemdziesiąt">  <i>siedemdziesi</i><par n="pięćdziesi/ąt__num"/></e>
<e lm="sześćset">        <i>sześ</i><par n="pię/ćset__num"/></e>
<e lm="sześćdziesiąt">   <i>sześćdziesi</i><par n="pięćdziesi/ąt__num"/></e>
